Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1142
Presence of licensed dental hygienist or dental assistant required.

General anesthesia, deep sedation, moderate sedation, and minimal sedation shall not be administered by a dentist without the presence and assistance of a licensed dental hygienist or a dental assistant.

Laws 1986, LB 438, § 8;

Laws 1999, LB 800, § 9;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-193.28;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 475;

Laws 2015, LB80, § 12.